Massachusetts, session 194th, H4737.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 6 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after Section
15EEEEEEE, added by chapter 32 of the acts of 2025, the following section:-
Section 15FFFFFFF. The governor shall annually issue a proclamation setting apart May
2 as Veterinary Youth Day to call attention to the youth of the commonwealth to get involved in
veterinary medicine, to raise awareness of the shortage of veterinarians in commonwealth and
the importance of animal welfare and to call for schools, individuals and communities to partner
with local veterinarians and animal shelters in the commonwealth to expose students to careers in
veterinary medicine and shall recommend that the day be observed in an appropriate manner by
the people.
of 1